Utah statutes.
7-23-504.   Penalties.

(1)  A person who violates this chapter or who files materially false information with a registration or renewal under Section 7-23-201 is:

(a)  guilty of a class B misdemeanor, except for a violation of:

(i)  Subsection 7-23-401(1)(f)(i), (ii), or (iii); or

(ii)  rules made under Subsection 7-23-501(2)(b); and

(b)  subject to revocation of a person's registration under this chapter.

(2)  Subject to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, if the department determines that a person is engaging in the business of cashing checks or the business of deferred deposit lending in violation of this chapter, the department may:

(a)  revoke that person's registration under this chapter;

(b)  issue a cease and desist order from committing any further violations;

(c)  prohibit the person from continuing to engage in the business of:

(i)  cashing checks; or

(ii)  deferred deposit lending;

(d)  impose an administrative fine not to exceed $1,000 per violation, except that:

(i)  a fine imposed under Subsection 7-23-201(4) shall comply with Subsection 7-23-201(4); and

(ii)  the aggregate total of fines imposed under this chapter against a person in a calendar year may not exceed $30,000 for that calendar year; or

(e)  take any combination of actions listed under this Subsection (2).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 96, 2008 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

